Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2949
Marketing contract, defined; authority.

In this section and sections 21-2950 to 21-2952, marketing contract means a contract between a limited cooperative association and another person that need not be a patron member:

(1) Requiring the other person to sell, or deliver for sale or marketing on the person's behalf, a specified part of the person's products, commodities, or goods exclusively to or through the limited cooperative association or any facilities furnished by the association; or

(2) Authorizing the limited cooperative association to act for the person in any manner with respect to the products, commodities, or goods.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 49;

Laws 2008, LB848, § 10.